Arkansas, session 2025, HB1250.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 26, Chapter 52, Subchapter 4 is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
26-52-457. Sales tax holiday for disaster-preparedness items.
(a) As used in this section:
(1)(A) “Battery” means:
(i) An A, AA, AAA, C, D, 6-volt, or 9-volt battery;
and
(ii) A cellular telephone battery.
(B) “Battery” does not include an automobile battery or
marine battery;
(2)(A) “Disaster-preparedness fastening supply” means an item
used for securing property or covering property that may be used in
preparation or response to a disaster.
(B) “Disaster-preparedness fastening supply” includes only
*JLL099*
01/27/2025 10:57:25 AM JLL099

HB1250
a:
(i) Bungee cord;
(ii) Rope;
(iii) Ratchet strap;
(iv) Duct tape;
(v) Boat anchor;
(vi) Fender, anchor chain, dock line, or similar
device;
(vii) Tarpaulin and other flexible waterproof
sheeting; and
(viii) Ground anchor or tie down kit;
(3)(A) “Disaster-preparedness food-related supply” means a food
or food-related item that may be used in preparation or response to a
disaster.
(B) “Disaster-preparedness food-related supply” includes
only:
(i) Artificial ice;
(ii) A water storage container;
(iii) A manual can opener; and
(iv) Bottled water;
(4)(A) “Disaster-preparedness general supply” means a general-
purpose item that may be used in preparation or response to a disaster.
(B) “Disaster-preparedness general supply” includes only
a:
(i) Battery;
(ii) Cellular telephone charger;
(iii) Satellite phone;
(iv) Self-powered light source;
(v) Portable self-powered radio, two-way radio,
weather-band radio, or National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration
weather radio;
(vi) Gas container or diesel fuel container;
(vii) Nonelectric food storage cooler;
(viii) Portable generator; and
(ix) Storm shutter device;
(5)(A) “Disaster-preparedness safety supply” means a safety item
01/27/2025 10:57:25 AM JLL099

HB1250
that may be used in preparation or response to a disaster.
(B) “Disaster-preparedness safety supply” includes only a:
(i) Carbon monoxide detector;
(ii) Smoke detector;
(iii) Fire extinguisher; and
(iv) First-aid kit; and
(6)(A) “Disaster-preparedness supply” means an item purchased in
preparation or response to a disaster, including any fire, flood, storm,
tidal wave, earthquake, or similar public calamity, whether man-made,
resulting from war, or resulting from natural causes.
(B) “Disaster preparedness supply” includes only the
following categories of items:
(i) Disaster-preparedness fastening supplies;
(ii) Disaster-preparedness food-related supplies;
(iii) Disaster-preparedness general supplies; and
(iv) Disaster-preparedness safety supplies.
(b) The gross receipts or gross proceeds derived from the sale of a
disaster-preparedness supply are exempt from the gross receipts tax levied by
this chapter and the compensating use tax levied by the Arkansas Compensating
Tax Act of 1949, § 26-53-101 et seq., every year from 12:01 a.m. on the first
Saturday in November and ending at 11:59 p.m. the following Sunday.
(c) The Department of Finance and Administration shall promulgate
rules to implement this section.

SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 1 of this act is effective on the
first day of the calendar quarter following the effective date of this act.










01/27/2025 10:57:25 AM JLL099